Hawaii statutes.
[PART I.
GENERALLY]

Revision Note

Part I designation added by revisor in view of addition of
Part II by L 1980, c 126, §2.

§266-1 Department of transportation;
harbors; jurisdiction. All commercial harbors and roadsteads, and all
commercial harbor and waterfront improvements belonging to or controlled by the
State, and all vessels and shipping within the commercial harbors and
roadsteads shall be under the care and control of the department of
transportation.

For the purpose of this chapter, "commercial
harbor" means a harbor or off-shore mooring facility which is primarily
for the movement of commercial cargo, passenger and fishing vessels entering,
leaving, or traveling within the State, and facilities and supporting services
for loading, off-loading, and handling of cargo, passengers, and vessels. [L
1911, c 163, §1; am L 1915, c 169, §1; ratified, March 28, 1916, c 54, 39 Stat
39; RL 1925, §832; RL 1935, §1730; am L 1941, c 142, §1; RL 1945, §4981; am L
1951, c 22, §1; RL 1955, §112-1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §26; HRS §266-1; am L
1985, c 104, §1; am L 1986, c 57, §1; am L 1991, c 272, §8]

Note

Further requirements on conveyance of parcels at Piers 1 and
2. L 2006, c 165, §5.

Cross References

Functions, generally, see §26-19.

Attorney General Opinions

Title to land formerly below high-water mark reclaimed by
riparian owner belongs to State. Att. Gen. Op. 62-16.

Case Notes

State has care and control of all water and ocean below the
high-water mark (or vegetation line). 66 H. 55, 656 P.2d 1336.

Cited: 73 H. 359, 833 P.2d 70.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next